Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Jitneys and Taxis

§ 2031.
Jitneys; regulations; powers.

The legislative branch of a municipality shall have the power to make, establish, alter, amend, or repeal regulations for the operation, parking, soliciting, delivery, or fares in the jitney and taxi business in general within the municipality and to establish penalties for the breach thereof, not to exceed $100.00 for each violation thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 2032.
Referendum.

The right of a legislative branch of a municipality to make such regulations shall not take effect until they have been approved and accepted by a majority of the voters of the municipality attending a duly warned regular or special meeting called for that purpose, nor shall such regulations take effect until they are published once a week on the same day for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in such municipality or, in the absence thereof, in a newspaper circulating within the county.